src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
The word forms in Komi (Zyrian) language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
* SUBSTANDARDS ;  temporary solution
* adjectives ; 
* kom-adjectives-russian-like ; 
* adpositions ; 
* adverbs ; 
* conjunctors ; 
* descriptives ; 
* determiners ; 
* gerunds ; 
* interjections ; 
* nouns ; 
* numerals ; 
* particles ; 
* pronouns ; 
* propernouns-malenames-cyrillic ; 
* propernouns-malesurnames-cyrillic ; 
* propernouns-toponyms-Russian ; 2019-10-30 Cyrillic
* @U.Cap.Obl@ propernouns-toponyms-Komi ;  toponyms - always uppercase
* @U.Cap.Opt@ propernouns-toponyms-Komi ;  toponyms - allow downcasing for adj derivation
* propernouns ; 
* quantifiers ; 
* subjunctors ; 
* verbs-A2M ; 
* verbs-N2END ; 
* VERBNEGATIVE ;  affixes/verbs.lexc
* PRONOUN-TYPES ;  in affixes/pronouns.lexc 2019-04-06
* Abbreviation ; 
* Acronym ; 
* kpv-Acronym ; 
* Punctuation ; 
* Symbols ; 
* EXCEPTIONS ; 
* dialect_lexicon ; 
* urj-Cyrl-ProperNouns ; ! Testing 2015-09-06
* A_NEWWORDS ; 
* ADV_NEWWORDS ; 
* N_NEWWORDS ; 
* @U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_NEWWORDS ; 
* @U.Cap.Opt@ PROP_NEWWORDS ; 
* V_NEWWORDS ; 

### Lexica without morphology !

Absolute forms
ABS_
пу керка
выль керка

### Compounding

R

Serial-Verbs

### Lexica called End, whatever they are 

ABBR-IS_ADV

ABBR-IS_N

### Clitics 

K

WordEnd

WordEnd-2

SPAT-COMPARATIVE

COMPARATIVE

SUBSTANDARDS

## Endlex

Lexicon ENDLEX
And this is the ENDLEX of everything:

@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@@D.CmpPref.TRUE@@D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ;
The `@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@` flag diacritic is ued to disallow words tagged
with +CmpNP/Only to end here.
The `@D.NeedNoun.ON@` flag diacritic is used to block illegal compounds.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-kpv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
